Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-12,169
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Nebraska Transformational Projects Act, the definitions found in sections 81-12,170 to 81-12,181 shall be used.

Laws 2020, LB1107, § 85.